sk-SK: Textúra tyče: Žuvacia; Chrumkavá; Chrumkavá; Hutná; Ľahká; Vláčna; Mäkká (pečená); Iná
vi: Kết cấu thanh kẹo: Dẻo; Giòn; Giòn tan; Đặc; Nhẹ; Ẩm; Nướng mềm; Khác
nb: Bartekstur: Seig; Sprø; Knasende; Kompakt; Lett; Saftig; Mykbakt; Annet
de: Stangenstruktur: Zäh; Knusprig; Knackig; Kompakt; Leicht; Saftig; Weich gebacken; Sonstige
lt-LT: Strypo tekstūra: Tąsus; Trapus; Traškus; Tankus; Lengvas; Drėgnas; Minkštai keptas; Kita
sl-SI: Tekstura ploščice: Žvečljivo; Krhko; Hrustljavo; Gosto; Lahko; Sočno; Mehko pečeno; Drugo
hr-HR: Tekstura pločice: Za žvakanje; Prhko; Hrskavo; Gusto; Lagano; Sočno; Meko pečeno; Ostalo
da: Stangens tekstur: Sej; Sprød; Knasende; Kompakt; Let; Fugtig; Blødbagt; Andet
pt-BR: Textura da barra: Macio; Crocante; Muito crocante; Denso; Leve; Úmido; Assado macio; Outros
sv: Stångens textur: Seg; Frasig; Knaprig; Kompakt; Lätt; Saftig; Mjukbakad; Övrigt
tr: Bar dokusu: Çiğnenebilir; Çıtır; Kıtır; Yoğun; Hafif; Nemli; Yumuşak pişmiş; Diğer
ko: 막대형 질감: 쫀득함; 바삭함; 크런치; 꽉 찬 식감; 가벼운 식감; 촉촉함; 부드러운 구움 식감; 기타
el: Υφή μπάρας: Μαστιχωτό; Τραγανό; Κριτσανιστό; Συμπαγές; Ελαφρύ; Υγρό; Μαλακό; Άλλο
ja: バーのテクスチャ: チューイー; クリスピー; クランチー; ずっしり; 軽い; しっとり; ソフトベイクド; その他
zh-CN: 条状纹理: 有嚼劲; 酥脆; 爽脆; 紧实; 松软; 湿润; 软烤; 其他
fi: Patukan tekstuuri: Sitkeä; Rapea; Rouskuva; Tiivis; Kevyt; Kostea; Pehmeäksi paistettu; Muu
es: Textura de la barra: Masticable; Crujiente; Crocante; Denso; Ligero; Húmedo; Horneado suave; Otro
fr: Texture de la barre: Moelleux; Croustillant; Croquant; Dense; Léger; Fondant; Cuit à cœur; Autre
nl: Bar textuur: Chewy; Krokant; Knapperig; Compact; Licht; Smeuïg; Zachtgebakken; Overig
ro-RO: Textură batonului: Masticabil; Crocant; Foarte crocant; Dens; Ușor; Umed; Copt moale; Altele
bg-BG: Текстура на бара: Дъвчащ; Хрупкав; Хрупкав; Плътен; Лек; Сочен; Меко изпечен; Друго
pl: Tekstura batona: Ciągnący; Chrupki; Chrupiący; Zbity; Lekki; Wilgotny; Miękkiego wypieku; Inna
ru: Текстура батончика: Жевательная; Хрустящая; С хрустящими кусочками; Плотная; Легкая; Влажная; Мягкой выпечки; Другое
it: Texture della barra: Gommoso; Friabile; Croccante; Compatto; Leggero; Umido; A pasta morbida; Altro
pt-PT: Textura de barra: Mastigável; Crocante; Estaladiço; Denso; Leve; Húmido; Macio; Outro
en: Bar texture: Chewy; Crispy; Crunchy; Dense; Light; Moist; Soft baked; Other
th: เนื้อสัมผัสแท่งขนม: หนึบ; กรอบ; กรุบกรอบ; เนื้อแน่น; เบา; ชุ่มฉ่ำ; อบนิ่ม; อื่นๆ
cs: Struktura tyče: Žvýkací; Křehké; Křupavé; Hutné; Lehké; Vláčné; Měkce pečené; Jiné
zh-TW: 營養棒質地: 有嚼勁; 酥脆; 爽脆; 紮實; 輕盈; 濕潤; 軟烘焙; 其他
hu: Rúd textúrája: Rágós; Ropogós; Roppanós; Tömör; Könnyű; Szaftos; Puhára sütött; Egyéb